Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.300

Travel expenses of state officials and employees.

Except as otherwise provided by law the payment of travel expenses by the state to any appointive official or employee of any commission, agency, or other body of the executive, judicial, or legislative branches of state government shall be in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.